zh-TW: 握把樣式: D 形握把; 人體工學軟墊握把; P 形握把; 直式; T 型握把; 其他
lt-LT: Rankenos suėmimo tipas: D formos rankena; Ergonomiška minkšta rankena; P formos rankena; Tiesus; T formos rankena; Kita
fr: Forme de la poignée: Poignée en D; poignée ergonomique souple; Poignée en P; Lisses; Poignée en T; Autre
hu: Markolat típusa: D-markolat; Ergonomikus, puha markolat; P-markolat; Egyenes; T-markolat; Egyéb
sk-SK: Štýl úchopu rukoväte: Úchop v tvare D; Ergonomická mäkká rukoväť; Úchop v tvare P; Rovný; Úchop v tvare T; Iné
bg-BG: Стил на дръжката за хващане: D-захват; Ергономична ръкохватка с меко покритие; P-захват; Право; Т–образна дръжка; Друго
th: รูปแบบปลอกหุ้มด้าม: ด้ามจับทรงตัว D; ด้ามจับนุ่มตามหลักสรีรศาสตร์; ด้ามจับทรงตัว P; ตรง; ด้ามจับทรงตัว T; อื่นๆ
fi: Kahvan otepinnan tyyli: D-kahva; Ergonominen pehmeä kahva; P-kahva; Suora; T-kahva; Muu
sv: Handtagsgreppsstil: D-grepp; Ergonomiskt mjukt grepp; P-grepp; Rakt; T-grepp; Övrigt
ru: Тип ручки: D-образная рукоятка; Эргономичная мягкая рукоятка; Р-образная рукоятка; Прямая; Т-образная рукоятка; Другое
ja: ハンドルグリップのスタイル: D型グリップ; 人間工学に基づくソフトグリップ; P型グリップ; ストレート; T型グリップ; その他
ko: 손잡이 그립 스타일: D-그립; 인체공학적 소프트 그립; P-그립; 일자형; T-그립; 기타
pl: Typ rękojeści: Uchwyt D; Ergonomiczny, miękki uchwyt; Uchwyt P; Proste; Uchwyt T; Pozostałe
de: Griffform: D-Griff; Ergonomischer Softgriff; P-Griff; Gerade; T-Griff; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Estilo do punho: Pega em D; Pega ergonómica com revestimento macio; Pega em P; Liso; Pega em T; Outro
it: Stile dell'impugnatura: Impugnatura a D; Impugnatura ergonomica morbida; Impugnatura a P; Dritto; Impugnatura a T; Altro
ro-RO: Stil de prindere a mânerului: Mâner în D; Mâner ergonomic moale; Mâner în formă de P; Drept; Mâner în formă de T; Altele
es: Estilo de agarre: Agarre en D; Agarre ergonómico suave; Agarre en P; Liso; Agarre en T; Otros
vi: Kiểu tay cầm: Tay cầm chữ D; Tay cầm êm ái, thiết kế công thái học; Tay cầm chữ P; Thẳng; Tay cầm chữ T; Khác
hr-HR: Stil hvata ručke: D-hvat; Ergonomski mekani hvat; P-hvat; Ravna; T-hvat; Ostalo
tr: Sap tutma stili: D tipi tutma kolu; Ergonomik yumuşak tutuş; P tipi tutma kolu; Düz; T tipi tutma kolu; Diğer
zh-CN: 手柄握把的样式: D 型; 符合人体工学的软握; P 型; 直柄; T 型握把; 其他
da: Skaftsgrebstype: D-greb; Ergonomisk blødt greb; P-greb; Lige; T-greb; Andet
sl-SI: Slog oprijema ročaja: D-ročaj; Ergonomski mehak oprijem; P-oprijem; Ravni; T-ročaj; Druga
el: Τύπος λαβής χειρολαβής: Λαβή σε σχήμα D; Εργονομική μαλακή λαβή; Λαβή σε σχήμα P; Ευθύ; Λαβή σε σχήμα Τ; Άλλο
pt-BR: Estilo de aderência do cabo: Alça em D; Alça ergonômica com revestimento macio; Alça em P; Liso; Alça em T; Outro
nb: Grepstil for håndtak: D-grep; Ergonomisk mykt grep; P-grep; Rett; T-grep; Annet
nl: Handgreepstijl: D-greep; Ergonomische softgrip; P-greep; Steil; T-greep; Overig
cs: Provedení rukojeti: D-rukojeť; Ergonomická měkká rukojeť; P-rukojeť; Rovná rukojeť; Rukojeť ve tvaru T; Jiný
en: Handle grip style: D-grip; Ergonomic soft-grip; P-grip; Straight; T-grip; Other